Mississippi, session 2026, HB1595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. There is created the Commissioner of Education for the Mississippi Delta School Districts Act. SECTION 2.  As used in this act, the following terms shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "College and career readiness" means the skills, knowledge, and dispositions needed to succeed in post secondary education or training that leads to gainful employment, encompassing both academic preparation and the ability to thrive in a workplace. Students are prepared to enter and succeed in entry level postsecondary courses or training programs without remediation. (b) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Education for the Mississippi Delta School Districts, who shall be a retired educator from the Mississippi Delta. (c)  "Literacy in reading and comprehension" means going beyond decoding words to actively understanding, interpreting, evaluating and understanding written text to achieve goals, build knowledge, and participate in society, involving skills like making inferences, questioning, visualizing, and connecting ideas. Comprehension is the core of this, focusing on constructing meaning from text through literal recall, critical thinking, and applying background knowledge. SECTION 3. (1)  There is created the position of Commissioner of Education for the Mississippi Delta School Districts who shall have complete autonomy To establish the necessary guidelines for the  Delta school districts, which shall include guidelines established by the Mississippi Department of Education. (2)  (a)  The annual salary for the  commissioner shall be $160,000.00. (b)  The annual salary for a part time assistant for such commissioner shall be $30,000.00. (3)  Duties of the commissioner shall be as follows: (a)  To close the achievement gap and increase the number of students  in  Mississippi school districts who are proficient in math, English Language Arts, science, college and career readiness in order to begin the development of a skilled workforce in the Mississippi delta. (b)  Provide a  minimum of three (3) visits to each school district that includes one announced visit with a one week advance notice. (c)  To work closely with the school district's superintendents and building principals to maximize the talents and ability of all faculty and staff in an effort to improve literacy in reading and comprehension. (d)  To work closely with the support staff, teacher, parents and community stakeholders to create an open line of communication and collaboration to foster a community of student literacy in reading and comprehension to increase the percentage of students who are college and career ready and who will become productive citizens. (e)  To work closely with local school boards to adopt policies that reflect their commitment to student literacy in reading and comprehension. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.